Nebraska, session 109, LB198.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 44-4601, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
44-4601 Sections 44-4601 to 44-4612 and sections 4 to 8 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Pharmacy Benefit Manager Licensure and
Regulation Act.
Sec. 2. Section 44-4603, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
44-4603 For purposes of the Pharmacy Benefit Manager Licensure and
Regulation Act:
(1) Auditing entity means a pharmacy benefit manager or any person that
represents a pharmacy benefit manager in conducting an audit for compliance
with a contract between the pharmacy benefit manager and a pharmacy;
(2) Claims processing service means an administrative service performed in
connection with the processing and adjudicating of a claim relating to a
pharmacist service that includes:
(a) Receiving a payment for a pharmacist service; or
(b) Making a payment to a pharmacist or pharmacy for a pharmacist service;
(3) Clinician-administered drug means an outpatient prescription drug
other than a vaccine that:
(a) Cannot reasonably be self-administered by the covered person to whom
the drug is prescribed or by an individual assisting the covered person with
self-administration; and
(b) Is typically administered:
(i) By a health care provider authorized to administer the drug, including
when acting under a physician's delegation and supervision; and
(ii) In a physician's office, hospital outpatient infusion center, or
other clinical setting;
(4) (3) Covered person means a member, policyholder, subscriber, enrollee,
beneficiary, dependent, or other individual participating in a health benefit
plan;
(5) (4) Director means the Director of Insurance;
(6) (5) Health benefit plan means a policy, contract, certificate, plan,
or agreement entered into, offered, or issued by a health carrier or self-
funded employee benefit plan to the extent not preempted by federal law to
provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of a
physical, mental, or behavioral health care service;
(7) (6) Health carrier has the same meaning as in section 44-1303;
(8) Maintenance medication means a drug prescribed for a chronic, long-
term condition and taken on a regular, recurring basis;
(9) Network pharmacist means a pharmacist that has a contract, either
directly or through a pharmacy services administrative organization, with a
pharmacy benefit manager to provide covered drugs at a negotiated reimbursement
rate;
(10) Network pharmacy means a pharmacy that has a contract, either
directly or through a pharmacy services administrative organization, with a
pharmacy benefit manager to provide covered drugs at a negotiated reimbursement
rate;
(11) (7) Other prescription drug or device service means a service other
than a claims processing service, provided directly or indirectly, whether in
connection with or separate from a claims processing service, including, but
not limited to:
(a) Negotiating a rebate, discount, or other financial incentive or
arrangement with a drug company;
(b) Disbursing or distributing a rebate;
(c) Managing or participating in an incentive program or arrangement for a
pharmacist service;
(d) Negotiating or entering into a contractual arrangement with a
pharmacist or pharmacy;
(e) Developing and maintaining a formulary;
(f) Designing a prescription benefit program; or
(g) Advertising or promoting a service;
-1-

LB198 LB198
2025 2025
(12) Participating provider has the same meaning as in section 44-7103;
(13) (8) Pharmacist has the same meaning as in section 38-2832;
(14) (9) Pharmacist service means a product, good, or service or any
combination thereof provided as a part of the practice of pharmacy;
(15) (10) Pharmacy has the same meaning as in section 71-425;
(16)(a) (11)(a) Pharmacy benefit manager means a person, business, or
entity, including a wholly or partially owned or controlled subsidiary of a
pharmacy benefit manager, that provides a claims processing service or other
prescription drug or device service for a health benefit plan to a covered
person who is a resident of this state; and
(b) Pharmacy benefit manager does not include:
(i) A health care facility licensed in this state;
(ii) A health care professional licensed in this state;
(iii) A consultant who only provides advice as to the selection or
performance of a pharmacy benefit manager; or
(iv) A health carrier to the extent that it performs any claims processing
service or other prescription drug or device service exclusively for its
enrollees; and
(17) Pharmacy benefit manager affiliate means a pharmacy or pharmacist
that directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, owns or
controls, is owned or controlled by, or is under common ownership or control
with a pharmacy benefit manager;
(18) Pharmacy services administrative organization means an entity that
provides a contracted pharmacy with contracting administrative services
relating to prescription drug benefits;
(19) (12) Plan sponsor has the same meaning as in section 44-2702; .
(20) Specialty pharmacy means:
(a) A pharmacy that specializes in dispensing drugs for patients with rare
or complex medical conditions;
(b) A pharmacy that specializes in prescription drugs that have specific
storage or dispensing requirements; or
(c) A pharmacy that holds a specialty pharmacy accreditation from a
nationally recognized independent accrediting organization; and
(21) Spread pricing means the method of pricing a drug in which the
contracted price for a drug that a pharmacy benefit manager charges a health
benefit plan differs from the amount the pharmacy benefit manager directly or
indirectly pays the pharmacist or pharmacy for pharmacist services.
Sec. 3. Section 44-4610, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
44-4610 (1) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not exclude a Nebraska
pharmacy from participation in the pharmacy benefit manager's specialty
pharmacy network if:
(a) (1) The pharmacy holds a specialty pharmacy accreditation from a
nationally recognized independent accrediting organization; and
(b) (2) The pharmacy is willing to accept the terms and conditions of the
pharmacy benefit manager's agreement with the pharmacy benefit manager's
specialty pharmacies.
(2) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not:
(a) Apply terms and conditions to an unaffiliated specialty pharmacy that
are stricter than the terms and conditions required for any specialty pharmacy
affiliated with the pharmacy benefit manager;
(b) Apply terms and conditions to specialty pharmacies that are
inconsistent with the Pharmacy Benefit Manager Licensure and Regulation Act; or
(c) Require data reporting from specialty pharmacies more frequently than
quarterly unless reasonably necessary for the pharmacy benefit manager to
collect or report data obtained pursuant to subdivision (3)(a) or (b) of this
section.
(3) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not impose reporting terms and
conditions that require a specialty pharmacy to collect and remit data unless
such terms and conditions are:
(a) Necessary for a pharmacy benefit manager to meet reporting obligations
required by federal or state laws or regulations;
(b) Related to data (i) that may only be obtained from the specialty
pharmacy and (ii) that a pharmacy benefit manager is contractually obligated to
provide to another entity in order for that entity to meet reporting
obligations required by federal or state laws or regulations;
(c) Necessary for purposes of payment integrity or rebate administration;
or
(d) Submitted by the specialty pharmacy to the nationally recognized
independent accrediting organization from which the specialty pharmacy holds an
accreditation.
(4) In addition to other terms and conditions consistent with this
section, a pharmacy benefit manager may impose contract terms and conditions
that are reasonably necessary to demonstrate that the specialty pharmacy has
sufficient:
(a) Policies and metrics related to providing quality and consistent care
for patients using the pharmacy; and
(b) Policies and procedures consistent with industry standards to avoid
instances of fraud, waste, or abuse.
Sec. 4. (1) A specialty pharmacy that ships a clinician-administered drug
to a health care provider or pharmacy shall:
(a) Comply with all federal laws regulating the shipment of drugs,
including, but not limited to, general chapter 800 of the United States
-2-

LB198 LB198
2025 2025
Pharmacopeia;
(b) In response to questions from a health care provider or pharmacy,
provide access to a pharmacist or nurse employed by the specialty pharmacy
twenty-four hours per day, seven days per week;
(c) Allow a covered person and health care provider to request a refill of
a clinician-administered drug on behalf of a covered person in accordance with
the pharmacy benefit manager's or health carrier's utilization review
procedures; and
(d) Adhere to the track and trace requirements, as described in the
federal Drug Supply Chain Security Act, 21 U.S.C. 360eee et seq., for a
clinician-administered drug that needs to be compounded or manipulated and, if
requested by the health care provider or the provider's designee, provide the
track and trace information to the health care provider or designee.
(2) For any clinician-administered drug dispensed by a specialty pharmacy
selected by the pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier, the requesting
health care provider or the provider's designee shall provide the requested
date, approximate time, and place of delivery of a clinician-administered drug
at least five business days before the date of delivery. The specialty pharmacy
shall require a signature of the health care provider or the provider's
designee upon receipt of the shipment when shipped to a health care provider.
If any clinician-administered drug dispensed by a specialty pharmacy is not
delivered as specified in this subsection, the covered person shall not be
financially responsible if the clinician-administered drug is not able to be
administered to the covered person.
(3) The requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not
apply when the specialty pharmacy and the health care provider administering
the clinician-administered drug have shared ownership.
(4) A pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier that requires dispensing
of a clinician-administered drug through a specialty pharmacy shall establish
and disclose a process which allows the health care provider or pharmacy to
appeal and have exceptions to the use of a specialty pharmacy when:
(a) A drug is not delivered as specified in subsection (2) of this
section; or
(b) An attending health care provider reasonably believes a covered person
may experience harm without the immediate use of a clinician-administered drug
that a health care provider or pharmacy has in stock.
(5) A pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier shall not:
(a) Require a specialty pharmacy to dispense a covered clinician-
administered drug directly to a covered person with the intention that the
covered person will transport the clinician-administered drug to a health care
provider for administration;
(b) Refuse to authorize or reimburse a participating provider for
dispensing a covered clinician-administered drug based on costs if the costs of
the drug to the health benefit plan are substantially similar as compared to
the costs of the drug if provided from a specialty pharmacy selected by the
pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier;
(c) Refuse to authorize or reimburse a participating provider pursuant to
the network agreement for the administration of covered clinician-administered
drugs;
(d) Penalize or remove from the network a participating provider solely
for refusing to administer a covered clinician-administered drug received from
a specialty pharmacy selected by the pharmacy benefit manager or health
carrier. If a participating provider refuses to source covered clinician-
administered drugs from a specialty pharmacy selected by the pharmacy benefit
manager or health carrier, the participating provider shall direct the covered
person to contact the health carrier for coverage options; or
(e) Require a covered person to obtain a clinician-administered drug from
a specialty pharmacy selected by the pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier
if a participating provider of the covered person's choice sources the drug and
provides for administration at substantially similar costs.
Sec. 5. (1) A health benefit plan, health carrier, or pharmacy benefit
manager shall not:
(a) Require a covered person, as a condition of payment or reimbursement,
to obtain pharmacist services exclusively through the mail-order pharmacy or
pharmacy benefit manager affiliate;
(b) Prohibit or limit a covered person from selecting a network pharmacist
or network pharmacy of the covered person's choice;
(c) Transfer a covered person's prescriptions from a network pharmacy to
another pharmacy unless requested by the covered person;
(d) Use financial incentives, including, but not limited to, adjustments
in cost-sharing obligations of a covered person, to the exclusive benefit of
the pharmacy benefit manager affiliate pharmacy; or
(e) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of this section, auto-enroll
a covered person in mail-order pharmacist services.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a health benefit
plan, health carrier, or pharmacy benefit manager from:
(a) Requiring a covered person to use a network specialty pharmacy;
(b) Auto-enrolling a covered person in mail-order pharmacist services for
a maintenance medication, provided that a covered person:
(i) Shall not be auto-enrolled for the first ninety days of a new
maintenance medication; and
(ii) Shall have the ability to opt out of mail-order pharmacist services
at any time;
-3-

LB198 LB198
2025 2025
(c) Informing a covered person of an ability to obtain pharmacist services
at a lower cost; or
(d) Requiring a covered person to obtain pharmacist services from a mail-
order pharmacy or pharmacy benefit manager affiliate when such services are not
otherwise available from another network pharmacy.
Sec. 6. (1) A network pharmacy or network pharmacist may decline to
provide a drug if the pharmacy or pharmacist will be or is paid less than the
acquisition cost for the drug.
(2) If a network pharmacy or network pharmacist declines to provide a drug
as authorized in subsection (1) of this section, the pharmacy or pharmacist
shall provide the covered person with adequate information as to where the
prescription for the drug may be filled or shall refer the covered person to
his or her plan sponsor.
(3) A pharmacy benefit manager, pharmacy services administrative
organization, or any person acting on behalf of a pharmacy benefit manager or
pharmacy services administrative organization shall not penalize, remove from
the network, or otherwise retaliate against a network pharmacy or network
pharmacist solely for declining to provide a drug as provided in subsection (1)
of this section.
Sec. 7. (1) A contract between a retail pharmacy and a pharmacy benefit
manager or plan sponsor shall not prohibit the retail pharmacy from offering
the following as an ancillary service of the retail pharmacy:
(a) The delivery of a prescription drug by mail or common carrier to a
covered person or his or her personal representative on request of the covered
person or personal representative if the request is made before the drug is
delivered; or
(b) The delivery of a prescription to a covered person or his or her
personal representative by an employee or contractor of the retail pharmacy.
(2) Nothing in this section shall require a retail pharmacy to receive a
request from a covered person or his or her personal representative for
delivery of a drug by mail, common carrier, or an employee or contractor of the
retail pharmacy when refilling or renewing prescription drug services for which
a request was previously received, so long as the retail pharmacy has confirmed
that the covered person wishes to receive the drug.
(3) A pharmacy benefit manager or plan sponsor shall not remove a retail
pharmacy from its networks or require a retail pharmacy to join a mail-order
pharmacy network for the sole reason of providing ancillary delivery services
as long as the ancillary delivery services were provided in compliance with
this section and with the terms and conditions of the retail pharmacy's
contract with the pharmacy benefit manager or plan sponsor and its pharmacy
services administrative organization, if applicable.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in a contract described in subsection (1)
of this section, a retail pharmacy shall not charge a plan sponsor or pharmacy
benefit manager for the delivery service described in subsection (1) of this
section.
(5) If a retail pharmacy provides a delivery service described in
subsection (1) of this section to a covered person, the retail pharmacy shall
disclose both of the following to the covered person or his or her personal
representative:
(a) Any fee charged to the covered person for the delivery of a
prescription drug; and
(b) That the plan sponsor or pharmacy benefit manager may not reimburse
the covered person for the fee described in subdivision (a) of this subsection.
(6) For purposes of this section, retail pharmacy means a pharmacy that
dispenses prescription drugs to the public at retail primarily to individuals
who reside in close proximity or who are receiving care from a provider in
close proximity to the pharmacy, typically by face-to-face interaction with the
individual or the individual's caregiver.
Sec. 8. (1) A contract between a pharmacy benefit manager and a health
benefit plan that is issued on or after January 1, 2026, shall not contain
spread pricing unless such contract is an extension of a contract entered into
prior to January 1, 2026, which included spread pricing.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2029, no contract between a pharmacy benefit
manager and a health benefit plan shall include spread pricing.
Sec. 9. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 10. Original sections 44-4601, 44-4603, and 44-4610, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-4-